Hawaii statutes.
[§171-8.6] Risk assessment working group.
(a) There is established a risk assessment working group that shall be
administratively attached to the department. The risk assessment working group
shall provide consultation to the board regarding the design and placement of
warning signs, devices, or systems on improved public lands as defined in
section 663-51, including any comprehensive plan submitted by the State, a
county, or managing entity, to the board for approval. The risk assessment
working group shall consist of the following members, who shall serve without
compensation:

(1) The
chairperson of the board, or designee;

(2) The mayor of
each county, or designee;

(3) The
administrators of the department's division of forestry and wildlife and the
division of state parks, or their designees;

(4) The attorney
general, or designee; and

(5) A person
appointed by the chairperson of the board knowledgeable in warning sign design.

[(b)] The
risk assessment working group shall submit a report of its recommendations and
of the consultation provided to the board of land and natural resources under
[Act 82, Session Laws of Hawaii 2003], including a listing of warning signs,
devices, and systems on improved and unimproved public lands subsequently
approved or disapproved by the board, to the legislature no later than twenty
days prior to the convening of each regular session. [L 2003, c 82, §§3, 4, 8;
am L 2007, c 152, §5; am L 2009, c 81, §3; am L 2014, c 86, §2]

Revision Note

L 2003, c 82, §4 is codified to this section as subsection
(b) pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Limitations on public entity liability in actions based upon
duty to warn of natural conditions, see chapter 663, pt VI.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next